Maryland, session 2026, HB1270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
26–102.
This title applies only in Prince George’s County.
26–1501.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1270*

HOUSE BILL 1270
(c) The following sections of Title 4, Subtitle 2 (“Issuance or Denial of Local
Licenses”) of Division I of this article apply in the county:
(5) § 4–208 (“Notice of license application required”), subject to [§] §§
26–1511 AND 26–1512 of this subtitle;
26–1511.
(c) (1) Before holding a hearing, the Board shall publish a notice of the hearing
[in at least two newspapers of general circulation in the county.
(2) The notice shall be published] ON THE BOARD’S WEBSITE, THROUGH
SOCIAL MEDIA, AND BY E–MAIL at least 30 days before the date by which license
applications are required to be filed for consideration at the hearing.
[(3)] (2) The notice shall contain:
(i) the number of licenses of each class that are available for
issuance;
(ii) a description of each class;
(iii) the date by which license applications must be filed to be
considered at the license application hearing; and
(iv) the date of the hearing.
26–1512.
(a) In addition to the [newspaper] INTERNET, SOCIAL MEDIA, AND E–MAIL
notice required under [§ 4–208 of this article] § 26–1511 OF THIS SUBTITLE, the Board
shall post a suitable notice in a conspicuous place at the location described in an application
for at least 10 days before the application hearing.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.